District of Columbia statutes.
31-3609.01

Denial of claims.

If a claim under a long-term care insurance contract is denied, the issuer shall, within 60 days of the date of a written request by the policyholder or certificate holder, or a representative thereof:

(1)

Provide a written explanation of the reasons for the denial; and

(2)

Make available all information directly related to the denial.

History

May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-121, § 10a
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 502(c), 49 DCR 6968